Hawaii statutes.
[§128A-3] State office of homeland
security. (a) There shall be established within the department of defense
an office of homeland security. The director of homeland security shall employ
appropriate personnel and make expenditures as may be necessary to carry out
this chapter. The director shall appoint an administrator of homeland security
who shall be exempt from chapter 76, subject to removal by the director, and
receive compensation as the director may determine.

(b) The director shall be responsible for
formulating and carrying out programs for homeland security. The director
shall:

(1) Ensure coordination and cooperation among all
organizations for homeland security; public agencies, including county, state,
and federal agencies; and private organizations; and

(2) Cooperate with county, state, and federal
homeland security and law enforcement agencies. [L 2013, c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next